Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-608 Application of proceeds of
collection or enforcement; liability for deficiency and right to surplus.
(a) If a security interest or agricultural lien secures payment or performance
of an obligation, the following rules apply:

(1) A secured party shall apply or pay over for
application the cash proceeds of collection or enforcement under section
490:9-607 in the following order to:

(A) The reasonable expenses of collection and
enforcement and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by
law, reasonable attorney's fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured
party;

(B) The satisfaction of obligations secured
by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or
enforcement is made; and

(C) The satisfaction of obligations secured
by any subordinate security interest in or other lien on the collateral subject
to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or
enforcement is made if the secured party receives an authenticated demand for
proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

(2) If requested by a secured party, a holder of a
subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of
the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder complies, the
secured party need not comply with the holder's demand under paragraph (1)(C).

(3) A secured party need not apply or pay over for
application noncash proceeds of collection and enforcement under section
490:9-607 unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A
secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall
do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

(4) A secured party shall account to and pay a debtor
for any surplus, and the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

(b) If the underlying transaction is a sale of
accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the debtor
is not entitled to any surplus, and the obligor is not liable for any
deficiency. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 228, §8]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next